Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1901
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 71-1901 to 71-1906.01:

(1) Person includes a partnership, limited liability company,
firm, agency, association, or corporation;

(2) Child means an unemancipated minor;

(3) Child-placing
agency has the definition found in section 71-1926;

(4) Department means the
Department of Health and Human Services;

(5) Foster care means engaged
in the service of exercising twenty-four-hour daily care, supervision, custody,
or control over children, for compensation or hire, in lieu of the care or
supervision normally exercised by parents in their own home. Foster care does
not include casual care at irregular intervals or programs as defined in section
71-1910;

(6) Foster
family home means a home which provides foster care to a child or children
pursuant to a foster care placement as defined in section 43-1301. Foster
family homes include licensed homes where the primary caretaker has no significant
prior relationship with the child or children in his or her care and both
licensed and unlicensed relative and kinship homes;

(7) Kinship home means
a home where a child or children receive foster care and at least one of the
primary caretakers has previously lived with or is a trusted adult that has
a preexisting, significant relationship with the child or children or a sibling
of such child or children pursuant to section 43-1311.02;

(8) Native American means
a person who is a member of an Indian tribe or eligible for membership in
an Indian tribe;

(9) Relative
home means a home where a child or children receive foster care and at least
one of the primary caretakers is related to the child or children, or to a
sibling of such child or children pursuant to section 43-1311.02, in his or
her care by blood, marriage, or adoption or, in the case of an Indian child,
at least one of the primary caretakers is an extended family member as defined
in section 43-1503; and

(10) Residential child-caring agency has the definition found in
section 71-1926.

Laws 1943, c. 154, § 1, p. 563;

R.S.1943, § 71-1901;

Laws 1945, c. 171, § 1, p. 548;

Laws 1961, c. 415, § 25, p. 1258;

Laws 1984, LB 130, § 13;

Laws 1987, LB 386, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 425;

Laws 1995, LB 401, § 24;

Laws 1995, LB 451, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 583;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 171;

Laws 2001, LB 209, § 19;

Laws 2002, LB 93, § 7;

Laws 2008, LB797, § 12;

Laws 2013, LB265, § 40.